Utah statutes.
70A-2-210.   Delegation of performance -- Assignment of rights.
(1)  A party may perform his duty through a delegate unless otherwise agreed
or unless the other party has a substantial interest in having his original
promisor perform or control the acts required by the contract. No delegation
of performance relieves the party delegating of any duty to perform or any
liability for breach.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in Section 70A-9a-406, unless otherwise
agreed, all rights of either seller or buyer can be assigned except where the
assignment would materially change the duty of the other party, or increase
materially the burden or risk imposed on him by his contract, or impair
materially his chance of obtaining return performance. A right to damages for
breach of the whole contract or a right arising out of the assignor's due
performance of his entire obligation can be assigned despite agreement
otherwise.
(3)  The creation, attachment, perfection, or enforcement of a security
interest in the seller’s interest under a contract is not a transfer that
materially changes the duty of or increases materially the burden or risk
imposed on the buyer or impairs materially the buyer’s chance of obtaining
return performance within the purview of Subsection (2) unless, and then only
to the extent that, enforcement actually results in a delegation of material
performance of the seller.  Even in that event, the creation, attachment,
perfection, and enforcement of the security interest remain effective, but:
(a)  the seller is liable to the buyer for damages caused by the delegation to
the extent that the damages could not reasonably be prevented by the buyer;
and
(b)  a court having jurisdiction may grant other appropriate relief, including
cancellation of the contract for sale or an injunction against enforcement of
the security interest or consummation of the enforcement.
(4)  Unless the circumstances indicate the contrary a prohibition of
assignment of "the contract" is to be construed as barring only the delegation
of (to) the assignee of the assignor's performance.
(5)  An assignment of "the contract" or of "all my rights under the contract"
or an assignment in similar general terms is an assignment of rights and
unless the language or the circumstances (as in an assignment of (for)
security) indicate the contrary, it is a delegation of performance of the
duties of the assignor and its acceptance by the assignee constitutes a
promise by him to perform those duties. This promise is enforceable by either
the assignor or the other party to the original contract.
(6)  The other party may treat any assignment which delegates performance as
creating reasonable grounds for insecurity and may without prejudice to his
rights against the assignor demand assurances from the assignee (Section
70A-2-609).
